Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 3 Marine Fisheries Council

20-3-1.
Council created — Membership — Compensation.

There is hereby created a marine fisheries council. The council shall be composed of the director of the department of environmental management, or the director’s designee, who shall serve as chairperson, and eight (8) private citizen members. The private citizen members shall be chosen from among those with skill, knowledge, and experience in the commercial fishing industry, the sport fishing industry, and in the conservation and management of fisheries resources and shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Three (3) of the private citizen members shall be representatives of the commercial fishing industry; three (3) shall be representatives of the sport fishing industry; and the remaining two (2) shall have skill, knowledge, and experience in the conservation and management of fisheries resources and/or marine biology. The chairperson of the coastal resources management council and the chiefs of the divisions of enforcement and marine fisheries in the department of environmental management shall serve in an advisory capacity to the council. Members of the council shall serve for a term of four (4) years and may not succeed themselves more than once after January 1, 2002. Initial appointments to the council shall be appointed as follows: three (3) members for a term of two (2) years; three (3) members for a term of three (3) years; and two (2) members for a term of four (4) years. All members of the council shall serve without compensation and shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses incurred in travel and in the performance of their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1985, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 304, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 4; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 4.

20-3-2.
Powers and duties.

The marine fisheries council shall serve in an advisory capacity only to the state and agencies of the state regarding marine fisheries issues and to the director of the department of environmental management in the exercise of his or her authority under this title for the planning, management, and regulation of marine fisheries on matters, including, but not limited to, the following activities:

The manner of taking fish, lobsters, and shellfish;

The legal size limits of fish, lobsters, and shellfish to be taken or possessed;

The seasons and hours during which fish, lobsters, and shellfish may be taken or possessed;

The numbers or quantities of fish, lobsters, and shellfish which may be taken or possessed; and

The opening and closing of areas within the coastal waters to the taking of any and all types of fish, lobsters, and shellfish.

The council shall report annually by March 1 of each year to the governor, the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the chairperson of the house committee on environment and natural resources, the chairperson of the senate committee on environment and agriculture, and to the house oversight committee and the senate committee on government oversight, for the preceding calendar year with regard to:

The advice it has given to state agencies, including specifically the department of environmental management, on marine fisheries issues;

The response it received to the advice it gave;

Any findings or position it may have with regard to the status and/or condition of marine fisheries; and

Any recommendations it may have for maintaining, improving, or changing laws, regulations, or management programs for marine fisheries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 304, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 359, § 2.

20-3-3.
Penalties.

Unless another penalty is specified in this title, any person who violates a rule or regulation of the marine fisheries council shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-3-4.
Shellfish and marine life management areas.

The council may recommend to the director of environmental management, the designation of certain portions of the shores of the public waters of the state, or land within the state covered by tidewater at either high or low tide, or portions of the free and common fisheries of the state as shellfish or marine life project management areas for the purpose of enhancing the cultivation and growth of marine species; managing the harvest of marine species; facilitating the conduct by the department of experiments in planting, cultivating, propagating, managing, and developing any and all kinds of marine life; and any other related purpose. The designation shall be pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, and shall be by reference to fixed landmarks. The council, upon the designation of a management area, shall propose any rules and regulations as it shall deem necessary for the protection and management of the management area and the animal life and property in the management area, including the exclusion or restriction of persons from the area or the prohibition of certain activities within the areas or other restrictions as it may deem necessary. Upon the designation of a management area, the director of environmental management shall place any stakes, bounds, buoys, or markers with the words “Rhode Island department of environmental management” plainly marked on them, as will approximate the management area. Failure to place or maintain the stakes, bounds, buoys, or markers shall not be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding. The director may make any experiments or conduct any activities as in his or her discretion are appropriate in these management areas.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 254, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 359, § 2.

20-3-5.
Emergencies.

The marine fisheries council may, without requirement of notice of hearing, recommend closure of any or all of the coastal waters of the state to the taking of any or all types of fish, lobsters, and shellfish where it determines that a biological emergency exists that imminently threatens the marine resources of the state subject to the provisions of § 42-35-3(b).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 359, § 2.

20-3-6.
Suspension and revocation of licenses.

The director of environmental management has the authority to suspend or revoke any shellfishing, lobster, or fishing license issued pursuant to any provision of this title, for violation of a rule and regulation adopted by the marine fisheries council, in any manner and for any period as the director determines by regulation. Any person aggrieved by an order of suspension or revocation may appeal the order in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-3-7.
Regulation of fishing in Great Salt Pond.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

20-10-1

through

20-10-4

, the electors of the town of New Shoreham may, in a town meeting called for that purpose, enact any ordinances to protect and to regulate the taking of shellfish and other fish in Great Salt Pond, and may impose penalties for violations of these ordinances not exceeding a fine of two hundred dollars ($200) and three (3) months imprisonment for any one offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 30, § 3; P.L. 1983, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 435, § 1.